Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2862.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-722, to read: START_STATUTE13-722. Sentencing enhancement for identity concealment; definition A. A person who is convicted of any offense prescribed in this title that was committed while wearing a mask with the intent to conceal the person's identity shall be sentenced for the next higher class of offense than that for which the person is charged. B. This section does not apply to Class 1 and class 2 felonies. C. The additional sentence imposed pursuant to this section is in addition to any enhanced sentence that may be applicable and does not preclude the court from imposing any other sentence that is authorized by law. D. The court may waive the application of this section at sentencing if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the mask was worn as a religious covering, consistent with the defendant's sincerely held religious beliefs. E. For the purposes of this section, "Mask" means a covering that obscures or is worn over a person's nose or mouth. END_STATUTE